Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1908
Life care contract, defined.

Life care contract
means a contract between a continuing care retirement community and a resident
of such community or his or her legal representative which:

(1) Includes
each of the following express promises:

(a) The community agrees to provide services
at any level along the continuum of care levels offered by the community;

(b) The base
room fee will not increase as a resident transitions among levels of care,
excluding any services or items upon which both parties initially agreed;
and

(c) If the resident outlives and exhausts resources to pay for services,
the community will continue to provide services at a reduced price or free
of charge to the resident, excluding any payments from medicare, the medical
assistance program, or a private insurance policy for which the resident is
eligible and the community is certified or otherwise qualified to receive;
and

(2) Requires the resident to agree to pay an entry fee to the community
and to remain in the community for a minimum length of time subject to penalties
against the entry fee.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 8.
July 1, 2011